parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/morph-cleanup.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
#
# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	modifications of morphological analyzer
# ENCODING:	UTF8 [€àâáäã]
# LANGUAGE:	Spanish
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller, Elena Lopez Garcia
# CREATED:	17-Feb-2006
# UPDATED:	27-May-2008 (AS: renamed; converted to UTF8)
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: 	fst -s morph-base.fst -l [ThisFile]
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

define LEX 


# derivation boundary 
define DB	[ "^|" ] ; 		# derivation marker
define SB	[ "^|" | "^=" ];	# segment boundary

define SP	"^_";

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove proper names that are redefined in special lexicons
read regex ~$[ %+Prop | %+WordPart ] .o. LEX ;

define LEX ;
# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove digits with spaces
define DIG	$%+Dig .o. LEX .o. $" " ;

define LEX 	LEX - DIG;

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> correct some tags in the lexicon

define MAP [

# add missing category for interrogative
# e.g.		cómo+Interrog+Man		==>	cómo+Adv+Interrog+Man
#		cúyo+Interrog+Poss+Masc+Sg	==>	cúyo+Pron+Interrog+Poss+Masc+Sg
	[..]	-> %+Pron || \[%+Pron] _ %+Interrog %+Poss
.o.	[..]	-> %+Adv  || \[%+Pron] _ %+Interrog 


# correct number of "lo" 
# e.g.		el+Art+Def+Neut+SP	==> el+Art+Def+Neut+Sg

.o.	%+SP -> %+Sg	|| %+Neut _ 

# possessives
.o.   %+Pron %+Gen -> %+Det %+Poss


];

read regex MAP.i .o. LEX ;


define LEX

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove some readings

define REMOVE [
  {españolar} %+Verb ?*
| {paso} %+Adj ?*
| {regalo} %+Adj ?*
| {ve} %+Let ?*
| {principal} %+Noun ?*
| {haber} %+Noun ?*
| {impositiva} %+Noun ?*
| {listín} %+Adj ?*
| {dictador} %+Adj ?*
| {resoltar} %+Verb ?*
| {recuerdo} %+Adj ?*
| {envanecimiento} %+Adj ?*
| {resulta} %+Noun ?*
| {lisa} %+Noun ?*
| {cuándo} %+Conj ?*
| {cuando} %+Adv ?*
| {facer} %+Verb ?*
| {romanzar} %+Verb ?*
| {frutar} %+Verb ?*
| {pistar} %+Verb ?*
| {erar} %+Verb ?*
| {sin} SP {embargo} %+Adv ?*
| {claro}  SP {que} %+Conj ?*
| {imprimar} %+Verb ?*
| {clarar} %+Verb ?*
| {falsar} %+Verb ?*
| {culturar} %+Verb ?*
| {según} %+Adv ?*

];

read regex  ~[REMOVE] .o. LEX ;

define LEX

define COLA ${colar} .o. LEX .o. {cola} ;

read regex LEX - COLA ;
